Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,143.06
Developmental disability regions; enumerated.

There are hereby created six developmental disability regions in the state. Each region shall consist of the following counties:

Region 1 shall consist of Sioux, Dawes, Sheridan, Box Butte, Scotts Bluff, Morrill, Garden, Kimball, Banner, Cheyenne, and Deuel counties;

Region 2 shall consist of Grant, Hooker, Thomas, Arthur, McPherson, Logan, Keith, Lincoln, Perkins, Dawson, Chase, Hayes, Frontier, Gosper, Dundy, Hitchcock, and Red Willow counties;

Region 3 shall consist of Blaine, Loup, Garfield, Wheeler, Custer, Valley, Greeley, Sherman, Howard, Merrick, Buffalo, Hall, Hamilton, Phelps, Kearney, Adams, Clay, Furnas, Harlan, Franklin, Webster, and Nuckolls counties;

Region 4 shall consist of Cherry, Keya Paha, Boyd, Brown, Rock, Holt, Knox, Cedar, Dixon, Antelope, Pierce, Wayne, Dakota, Thurston, Madison, Stanton, Cuming, Burt, Boone, Platte, Colfax, and Nance counties;

Region 5 shall consist of Saunders, York, Seward, Lancaster, Otoe, Polk, Butler, Fillmore, Saline, Gage, Johnson, Nemaha, Thayer, Jefferson, Pawnee, and Richardson counties; and

Region 6 shall consist of Dodge, Washington, Douglas, Sarpy, and Cass counties.

Laws 1973, LB 311, § 8;

Laws 1974, LB 302, § 16;

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 34.